Utah statutes.
11-36-303.   Refunds.

A local political subdivision shall refund any impact fees paid by a developer, plus interest earned, when:

(1)  the developer does not proceed with the development activity and has filed a written request for a refund;

(2)  the fees have not been spent or encumbered; and

(3)  no impact has resulted.

